Maine, session 132, LD2086.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 25 MRSA §1504, first ¶, as amended by PL 1985, c. 785, Pt. B, §109, is
further amended to read:
The Governor shall determine the salary of the chief and, the deputy chief and majors.
The compensation of the other members of the State Police shall be is determined under
the Civil Service Law.